Oklahoma, session 2025, SB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 13-116, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 13-116. A. School district personnel shall be
prohibited from using corporal punishment on students any student
identified with the most significant cognitive disabilities
according to criteria established by the State Department of
Education unless addressed in an annual individualized education
program (IEP) developed a disability in accordance with the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA).

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB364 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. A waiver to the provisions of subsection A of this section
shall be granted if the parent or legal guardian of a student
provides written consent.
C. As used in this section, “corporal punishment” means the
deliberate infliction of physical pain by hitting, paddling,
spanking, slapping, or any other physical force used as a means of
discipline.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB364 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)